Hawaii statutes.
§661-6 Complaint; assignments. The
claimant shall, in all cases, in addition to setting forth the claimant's
claim, show:

(1) What persons are owners of the claim or
interested therein, with their citizenship;

(2) The names and citizenship of all persons who have
been at any time owners of the claim or any part thereof or interest therein,
all of whom shall be citizens of the United States or persons eligible under
section 661-4; and

(3) That no assignment or transfer of the claim, or
of any part thereof or interest therein, has been made, except as stated in the
complaint.

Section 634-1 shall be applicable. [L 1894-5, c
26, §6; RL 1925, §2674; RL 1935, §4425; RL 1945, §10480; RL 1955, §245-6; HRS
§661-6; am L 1972, c 164, §1(f); gen ch 1985]

Revision Note

Section "634-1" substituted for "634-31"
and in paragraph (2), "and" added after ending punctuation pursuant
to §23G-15.

Case Notes

In action against Territory on contract made by certain
officers of house of representatives, petition should show authority to make
it. 19 H. 491 (1909).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next